Utah statutes.
31A-35-407.   Restricted account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Bail Bond Surety Administration Account."

(2) (a)  The account shall be funded from the fees imposed under this chapter.

(b)  The department shall deposit all fees collected under this part in the account.

(c)  The funds in the account shall be used by the department to administer this chapter.

(d)  The account shall earn interest, which shall be deposited in the account.

